Georgia, session 2025_26, HB705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to identification and regulation of motor vehicles and traffic, is
amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"40-1-10.
A police officer may, upon reasonable articulable suspicion that a motor vehicle is being
operated in violation of any provision of this title, stop or detain such vehicle. A traffic
stop based on a reasonable articulable suspicion predicated solely on the fact that a person
is operating a motorcycle or wearing motorcycle related paraphernalia shall be unlawful."
H. B. 705
- 1 -

LC 39 4685
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 705
- 2 -